District of Columbia statutes.
16-3709

Notice to officer of intention to move for return; duty of officer; time of motion.

If the defendant in an action of replevin notifies the officer taking possession of the property, in writing, of his intention to make either of the motions specified by section 16-3708 , the officer shall retain possession of the property until the motion is disposed of, if the motion is filed and notice given, as provided by section 16-3708 , to the plaintiff or his attorney, within two days thereafter.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 605, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-3709.
1973 Ed., § 16-3709.